Arkansas, session 2025, HB1368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 1-5-117(a), concerning the musicians
included in the nonexclusive list of musicians honored on Arkansas Music
Appreciation Day, is amended to add additional subdivisions to read as
follows:
(18) J.R. Rogers;
(19) Frank "Son" Seals;
(20) Royal Wade Kimes;
(21) Justin Moore; and
(22) Albert King.

/s/Rye


*JLL162*
02-13-2025 09:44:52 JLL162